Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General
§ 33-24-149.
Drug substitution procedures.

A pharmacist who receives a prescription for a brand name prescription drug may dispense any interchangeable biological product or generically equivalent drug of the brand name prescription drug prescribed, unless the prescribing practitioner has clearly indicated substitution is not permitted.

If a practitioner prescribes a prescription drug by its generic name or by the nonproprietary name of an interchangeable biological product, the pharmacist may dispense the generically equivalent drug or the interchangeable biological product as defined in this act.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, when a pharmacist dispenses an interchangeable biological product or generically equivalent drug as authorized by this act, he shall label the prescription container with the name of the dispensed biological product or drug. If the dispensed drug or product does not have a brand name, the prescription label shall indicate the generic name of the drug dispensed or the nonproprietary name of the interchangeable biological product dispensed.

The national drug code number or the name of the manufacturer or distributor of the interchangeable biological product or generically equivalent drug dispensed shall be noted on the prescription record or entry by the pharmacist.

A prescription dispensed by a pharmacist shall bear upon the label the name of the medication in the container except if the practitioner orders “do not label”, or words of similar import, on the prescription or so designates in an oral or electronic transmission of the prescription.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (g) and (j) of this section, not later than five (5) business days after dispensing a biological product, the dispensing pharmacist or the pharmacist’s designee shall make an entry of the specific product dispensed to the patient, including the name and manufacturer of the product. The entry shall be electronically accessible to the practitioner through one (1) of the following electronic records systems:

An interoperable electronic medical records system;

Electronic prescribing technology;

A pharmacy benefit management system; or

A pharmacy record.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (j) of this section, if an electronic records system under subsection (f) of this section is not available, the dispensing pharmacist shall, not later than five (5) business days after dispensing a biological product, communicate to the practitioner the specific product dispensed to the patient, including the name and manufacturer of the product, using facsimile, telephone, electronic transmission or any other prevailing means of communication.

An entry made into an electronic records system under subsection (f) of this section or a communication made under subsection (g) of this section shall establish a presumption that the practitioner received notice of the biological product dispensed to the patient.

The requirements of subsections (f) and (g) of this section shall not apply if:

There is no interchangeable biological product for the product prescribed by the practitioner; or

A prescription for a refill is not changed from the product dispensed on the prior filling of the prescription.

The dispensing pharmacist shall notify a patient of the biological product which was dispensed, which may be carried out through the prescription label required pursuant subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 35, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, § 1; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) and (b) substituted “prescription drug” for “dangerous drug” three times; in (a) deleted the last former end, which read: “if the drug to be dispensed has a lower, regular and customary retail price than the brand name dangerous drug prescribed, as provided in
W.S.

33-24-148

”; in (b) substituted “practitioner” for “physician,” substituted “may dispense” for “shall dispense”,
deleted “lowest retail cost brand in stock which is” preceding “generically equivalent,” and added “drug” preceding “as defined in this act”; in (d) substituted “record” for “memorandum”; in (e) substituted “orders” for “writes,” deleted “memorandum” following “on the prescription,” and substituted “oral or electronic transmission” for “oral transmission.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “interchangeable biological product or” preceding “generically equivalent drug”; in (b), inserted “or by the nonproprietary name of an interchangeable biological product” following “generic name”; in (b), inserted “or by the nonproprietary name of an interchangeable biological product” following “its generic name” and “or the interchangeable biological product” following “generically equivalent drug”; in (c), in the first sentence, substituted “an interchangeable biological product or generically equivalent drug” for “a substituted drug” preceding “as authorized by this act” and inserted “biological product or” preceding “drug” at the end, and in the second sentence, inserted “or product” following “dispensed drug” and “or the nonproprietary name of the interchangeable biological product dispensed” at the end; in (d), substituted “interchangeable biological product or generically equivalent drug” for “generic drug” following “manufacturer or distributor of” and inserted “or entry” preceding “by the pharmacist”; in (e), substituted “the practitioner” for “the prescriber” preceding “orders”; and added (f) through (k).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-147(a)(vi).

§ 33-24-150.
Pharmacist's liability.

Any pharmacist who selects the drug product to be dispensed shall assume no greater liability for selecting the dispensed product as would be incurred in filling a prescription for a drug product prescribed by generic name.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 35, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of pharmacist who accurately fills prescription for harm resulting to user, 44 ALR5th 393.

§ 33-24-151.
Substitution not considered practice of medicine; individual causes of action.

The substitution of any dangerous substance by a registered pharmacist or a registered pharmacy intern under his supervision does not under this act constitute the practice of medicine.

This act shall not be construed to deny any individual a cause of action against a pharmacist or his employer for violations of this act, including failure to observe accepted standards of care of the pharmaceutical profession.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 35, § 1; 2022 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “direct” preceding “supervision” in (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-24-147(a)(vi).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Druggist's civil liability for injuries sustained as result of negligence in incorrectly filling drug prescriptions, 3 ALR4th 259.

Liability of pharmacist who accurately fills prescription for harm resulting to user, 44 ALR5th 393.

§ 33-24-152.
Nonresident pharmacy registration; requirements for registration; fees; renewal; denial, letter of admonition, administrative penalty, revocation or suspension; advertising.

Any pharmacy located outside this state which ships, mails or delivers, in any manner, controlled substances or prescription drugs or devices into this state pursuant to a prescription or provides pharmaceutical care to a resident of this state shall be considered a nonresident pharmacy, shall obtain a license from the board, and shall:

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 215, § 2.

Comply with all directions and requests for information from the regulatory or licensing agency of the state in which it is licensed as well as with all requests for information made by the board pursuant to this section. The nonresident pharmacy shall maintain, at all times, a valid unexpired license, permit or registration to conduct the pharmacy in compliance with the laws of the state in which it is a resident;

Maintain its records of controlled substances or dangerous drugs or devices dispensed to patients in this state so that the records are readily retrievable from the records of other drugs dispensed;

Comply with all requirements of the Wyoming Generic Drug Substitution Act;

Submit a license application to the board on a form prescribed by the board and pay the license fee established by the board in its rules and regulations;

Immediately notify the board of the occurrence of any of the following:

Permanent closing of pharmacy operations;

Change in pharmacy ownership, name, management, location or pharmacist in charge;

Conviction of a pharmacy owner or employee for a felony under any state or federal drug law;

Any substantial theft or loss of dangerous drugs, controlled substances or medical devices;

Any other matter required to be reported by rule and regulation of the board.

Any pharmacy subject to this section shall, during its regular hours of operation, but not less than six (6) days per week, and for a minimum of forty (40) hours per week, provide a toll free telephone service to facilitate communication between patients in this state and a pharmacist at the pharmacy who has access to the patient’s records. This toll free number shall be disclosed on a label affixed to each container of drugs dispensed to patients in this state.

A pharmacy applying for licensure under this section shall be charged the fee specified in W.S. 33-24-112(a)(iii).

A nonresident pharmacy license under this section shall be renewed annually on or before June 30 by submitting a renewal application to the board.

The board may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a license issued under this section, may issue a letter of admonition to a nonresident pharmacy licensee and may assess an administrative penalty, not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) per violation, against a nonresident pharmacy licensee on any of the following grounds:

Failure to comply with any requirement of the pharmacy practice act of the state of domicile or the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act. Upon a determination by the board’s executive director that the pharmacy practice act of the state of domicile is less protective of the public than the provisions of this act and could endanger the public health, safety or welfare, the executive director before any adverse action pursuant to this paragraph shall provide notice of the noncompliance to the nonresident pharmacy and afford a reasonable opportunity to cure the noncompliance;

Failure to comply with rules and regulations of the board or regulatory body of the jurisdiction in which the pharmacy is located. Upon a determination by the board’s executive director that the rules and regulations of the state of domicile are less protective of the public than the provisions of the board’s rules and regulations and could endanger the public health, safety or welfare, the executive director before any adverse action pursuant to this paragraph shall provide notice of the noncompliance to the nonresident pharmacy and afford a reasonable opportunity to cure the noncompliance;

Conviction of a pharmacy owner, pharmacist in charge, staff pharmacist or pharmacy technician for a felony under any state or federal law, if the conviction is related to the practice of pharmacy;

Obtaining any remuneration by fraud, misrepresentation or deception;

Suspension or revocation of a pharmacy license or any other disciplinary action by a board of pharmacy against the licensee in any other state;

Knowing submission of false, misleading or fraudulent information to the board in connection with an initial or renewal application for a nonresident pharmacy license;

Purchase or receipt of a prescription drug, controlled substance or medical device from a source other than a manufacturer, wholesaler or pharmacy licensed by the regulatory authority in the state where the pharmacy is located;

Purchase or receipt of a prescription drug, controlled substance or medical device that is not approved by the federal food and drug administration;

Keeping the pharmacy open for business without a licensed pharmacist in charge on site.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 215, § 2.

It is unlawful for any nonresident pharmacy which is not licensed by the board to advertise its services in this state, or for any person to advertise the pharmacy services of a nonresident pharmacy which has not been licensed by the board, with the knowledge that the advertisement will or is likely to induce members of the public in this state to use the pharmacy to fill prescriptions. Any person convicted of violating this subsection shall be subject to the penalties provided by W.S.

33-24-142

.

Before any final adverse administrative action is taken against a nonresident pharmacy licensee, the licensee is entitled to a hearing by the board of pharmacy upon due notice of the time and place where the hearing will be held. The accused may be represented by legal counsel, is entitled to the compulsory attendance of witnesses and may appeal to the first judicial district court located in Laramie county in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 85, § 1; 1993, ch. 30, § 2; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2005, ch. 215, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, substituting language pertaining to licensing for language pertaining to registration throughout; repealing former (a)(i), which required disclosure of corporate officers and pharmacists dispensing controlled substances or dangerous drugs to Wyoming residents; deleting the former last sentence in (a)(ii), which required a copy of the most recent inspection report; adding (a)(v) and (a)(vi); in (d) changing the renewal date from July 1 to June 30; expounding on the grounds for denial, suspension, revocation or nonrenewal of a license in (e); repealing former (f), which allowed the board to deny, revoke or suspend a nonresident pharmacy registration for conduct causing serious bodily or psychological injury to a Wyoming resident if the board has referred the matter to an administrative or regulatory agency in the state where the pharmacy is located and that agency has failed to act within 45 days; adding (h); and making stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (e)(i) added second sentence; in (e)(ii) inserted “board or” preceding “regulatory body of the jurisdiction” and added last sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “prescription drugs” for “dangerous drugs” and variants throughout the section; in (e)(v) added “or any other disciplinary action by a board of pharmacy against the licensee,” and in (e)(viii) substituted “federal food and drug administration” for “federal drug administration.”

Wyoming Generic Drug Substitution Act. —

See §

33-24-146

.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a)(b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-153.
Manufacturer or wholesaler registration; requirements for registration; bonds or other security; fees; renewal; denial, revocation or suspension; record keeping; summary orders; administrative penalties; definitions.

Every wholesale distributor who engages in the distribution of prescription drugs in this state shall obtain from the board a drug distributor’s license for each distribution location. In addition, every nonresident wholesale distributor who ships prescription drugs into this state shall be licensed by the licensing authority in the state in which the distributor resides. For manufacturers engaged in wholesale distribution of prescription drugs in this state, the provisions of this section that are more stringent than those required by the United States food and drug administration shall not apply. This section shall not apply to resident pharmacies registered under W.S.

33-24-113

, nonresident pharmacies registered under W.S.

33-24-152

or to individuals practicing medicine as defined by W.S. 33-26-102(a)(xi)(B) and (E).

Applications for a drug distributor’s license under this section shall be made on a form furnished by the board. Applicants for licensure under this section shall provide the board with fingerprints, necessary fees and other information required to perform a criminal history record background check as provided for by W.S.

7-19-201

for the designated representative for each wholesale drug distributor site.

The fee for a drug distributor’s license shall be the fee specified in W.S. 33-24-112(a)(iii).

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 211, § 2.

Every drug distributor’s license shall be renewed annually on or before the first day of July.

Any administrative penalty assessed under this section shall be paid to the board who shall remit the monies to the county treasurer to the credit of the public school fund of the county in which the violation occurred.

By January 1, 2009, the board shall require every drug distributor license holder and applicant to submit a bond in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), or other security acceptable to the board such as an irrevocable letter of credit or deposit in a trust account or financial institution, payable to a fund established by the board pursuant to paragraph (h) of this section. The purpose of the bond or other security shall be to secure payment of any fines or penalties imposed by the board and any fees and costs incurred by the board regarding the drug distributor’s license which are authorized under state law and which remain unpaid thirty (30) days after liability for the payment is final. The board shall release the bond or security one (1) year after the distributor’s license ceases to be valid. The bond or security shall cover all facilities operated by the applicant and licensed by the board. The board may waive the requirement of a bond or other security if:

The drug distributor has previously obtained a comparable bond or other security for the purpose of licensure in another state where the wholesaler possesses a valid license in good standing; or

The drug distributor is a publicly held company.

The board shall establish a fund, separate from its other accounts, for the deposit of amounts submitted in lieu of a bond pursuant to subsection (g) of this section.

The board shall require each person engaged in wholesale distribution of prescription drugs to establish and maintain inventories and records of all transactions regarding the receipt and distribution or other disposition of the drugs.

The board shall issue an order to cease distribution of a prescription drug if the board finds that there is probable cause that:

A drug distributor has:

Violated a provision of this section; or

Sold, distributed, transferred, manufactured, repackaged, handled or held a counterfeit prescription drug intended for human or animal use.

The prescription drug at issue as a result of a violation in paragraph (k)(i)(B) of this section could cause serious adverse health consequences or death; and

Other procedures would result in unreasonable delay in responding to the dangers posed by the prescription drug at issue.

An order issued by the board pursuant to subsection (k) of this section shall provide the person subject to the order with an opportunity for an informal hearing, to be held not later than ten (10) working days after the date of the issuance of the order, on the actions required by the order. If, after providing an opportunity for a hearing, the board determines that inadequate grounds exist to support the actions required by the order, the board shall vacate the order.

The board may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a license issued under this section, may issue a letter of admonition and may assess an administrative penalty not to exceed those penalties established in paragraph (o) of this section for any of the following acts:

Failure to obtain a license in accordance with this section or operating without a valid license when a license is required;

The sale, distribution or transfer of a prescription drug to a person who is not authorized to receive the prescription drug under the law of the jurisdiction in which the person receives the prescription drug;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 169, § 2.

Providing the board with false or fraudulent records or making false or fraudulent statements regarding the provisions of this section or board rules;

Obtaining or attempting to obtain a prescription drug by fraud, deceit or misrepresentation, or engaging in fraud or misrepresentation in the distribution of a prescription drug;

Except for the wholesale distribution by manufacturers of a prescription drug that has been delivered into commerce pursuant to an application approved by the United States food and drug administration, the adulteration, misbranding or counterfeiting of any prescription drug;

The receipt of any prescription drug that is adulterated, misbranded, stolen, obtained by fraud or deceit, counterfeit or suspected of being counterfeit, or the delivery or proffered delivery of such drug whether for pay or otherwise; and

The adulteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration or removal of all or any part of the labeling of a prescription drug or the commission of any other act with respect to a prescription drug that results in the prescription drug being misbranded.

The board may assess an administrative penalty for a violation of subsection (n) of this section as follows:

If a person unknowingly engages in the wholesale distribution of prescription drugs and acts in violation of subsection (n) of this section, the person may be assessed an administrative penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00);

If a person knowingly engages in wholesale distribution of prescription drugs in violation of subsection (n) of this section, the person may be assessed an administrative penalty not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00).

The board is authorized to contract with a private person or entity to inspect and accredit drug distributors. Any proprietary information obtained during the accreditation process shall remain confidential and privileged. The board shall provide by rule and regulation for the administrative review of any decision denying accreditation.

The board may license by reciprocity a drug distributor that is licensed in another state if:

The requirements of the distributor’s domiciliary state are determined by the board to be substantially equivalent to the requirements of this state for licensing of drug distributors; or

The applicant is accredited by a third party approved by the board.

For purposes of this section:

“Designated representative” means an individual designated by a wholesale drug distributor and who is actively involved in and aware of the actual daily operation of the wholesale drug distributor at the wholesaler’s licensed location;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 169, § 2.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 85, § 1; 1993, ch. 204, § 1; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 211, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 169, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “W.S. 33-26-102(a)(xi)(B) and (E)” for “W.S.33-26-102(a)(x)(B) and (E).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a) and (b) repealed former (d), which pertained to authorization of the board to deny, revoke or suspend a drug distributor's license; and added (g) through (r).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), deleted the beginning of the second sentence, which formerly read: “By January 1, 2009, current license holders and”; in (j), deleted the second sentence, which formerly read: “The records shall include pedigrees for all prescription drugs that are or ever have been distributed outside the normal distribution channel as established by board regulations,”; and in (k)(B), deleted the beginning, which formerly read: “Falsified a pedigree or.”

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, deleted (n)(iii), which read: “Failure to obtain, pass or authenticate a pedigree as required by this section or board rules;”, and deleted (r)(ii), which read:““Pedigree” means a document or electronic file containing recorded information regarding each distribution of any given prescription drug.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act. —

See §§

35-7-1001

through

35-7-1057

.

Editor's notes. —

There are no subsections (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-24-154.
Emergency administration of controlled substances.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act or the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act, the board, by rule or regulation, may authorize nursing homes, hospices, extended care facilities or intermediate care facilities to maintain a limited supply of controlled substances or other drugs on the premises for emergency administration to the residents and patients therein without being subject to the licensure requirements of this act.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 101, § 1.

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act. —

See §§

35-7-1001

through

35-7-1057

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-155.
Reports required to state health officer.

As provided by department of health rule and regulation, a pharmacist shall report in the manner established through published reporting procedures provided to each licensed pharmacist, any unusually high volume of any type of prescription filled, unusual trend in pharmacy visits or unusual trend in nonprescription medication sales that the pharmacist has reason to believe is related to a public health emergency.

Pursuant to department of health rule and regulation, there may be a review of medical records by the state health officer, his designee or their designated health care representative who shall be under the supervision of the state health officer or his designee to confirm diagnosis, investigate causes or identify other cases of disease conditions in a region, community or workplace in the state to determine if proper measures have been taken to protect the public health and safety. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the review of records during a public health emergency or disease outbreak may occur without patient consent, but shall be kept confidential and shall be restricted to information necessary for the control, investigation and prevention of any disease condition dangerous to the public health. Any person who receives medical information under this subsection shall not disclose that information for any other purpose than the investigation and any disease control effort. Any violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1; 2022 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “direct” preceding “supervision” in (b).

§ 33-24-156.
Telepharmacy practice authorized.

The board pursuant to its rules and regulations may authorize a resident pharmacy licensee to store and dispense prescription drugs as provided in subsection (b) of this section through a telepharmacy located at a site at least ten (10) miles from a licensed pharmacy except this ten (10) mile restriction does not apply:

In counties with a city of fifty thousand (50,000) or more persons as shown in the most recent federal census; or

To any facility owned or leased by the state or any subdivision of the state; or

To any facility located in a hospital or clinic setting.

Telepharmacies shall include the following minimum features:

Storage, security and dispensing of prescription drugs only:

In unit of issue packages;

Through a system which dispenses tablets or capsules from an enclosed and lockable cabinet directly into a prescription vial and prints and applies a prescription label to the vial; or

By manually dispensing tablets, capsules or liquids from a stock bottle into a prescription vial and affixing a prescription label to the vial.

Connection by a secure communication system to the parent pharmacy, with the capability of live video and audio communication with a licensed pharmacist at the parent pharmacy during hours of operation;

Adequate provision for security, including verification of customer identity and prescription information;

Automated inventory control using bar codes, radio frequency tags or a similar identification system;

Prominent display of the name, address and toll free telephone number of the parent pharmacy;

Telepharmacies shall be supervised by a parent pharmacy and a licensed pharmacist and shall be staffed during hours of operation by a licensed pharmacist, certified pharmacy technician or registered pharmacy intern.

A telepharmacy system operated as provided in this act and in accord with rules and regulations of the board is deemed to be operated under the charge of a licensed pharmacist for purposes of W.S. 33-24-113(b).

A licensed pharmacist who supervises a telepharmacy shall complete an inspection of the telepharmacy at a frequency specified by the board of pharmacy. Inspection criteria shall be developed by the state board of pharmacy and all inspection criteria shall be included in the policies and procedures applicable to each telepharmacy site. Inspection reports shall be prepared pursuant to standards adopted by the board of pharmacy and shall be maintained by each telepharmacy until the next state board of pharmacy inspection.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 192, § 1; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2017 ch. 124, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b)(i) inserted “or through a mechanical system which dispenses tablets or capsules from an enclosed and lockable cabinet directly into a prescription vial and prints and applies a prescription label to the vial.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (a), which formerly read: “The board pursuant to its rules and regulations may authorize a licensed pharmacy to store and dispense prescription drugs as provided in subsection (b) of this section through a telepharmacy located at a site at least twenty-five (25) miles from a licensed pharmacy”; added (a)(i) through (a)(iii); in (b)(i), substituted “only” for “in unit of issue packages or through a mechanical system which dispenses tablets or capsules from an enclosed and lockable cabinet directly into a prescription vial and prints and applies a prescription label to the vial” and added (b)(i)(A) through (b)(i)(C); substituted “licensed pharmacist” for “registered pharmacist” in (b)(ii) and (c); added (b)(vi), in (c),
deleted the last sentence which read: “A pharmacist may not serve as a pharmacist in charge for more than one (1) telepharmacy at any one time”; and added (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 192, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 33-24-157.
Immunization administration.

A pharmacist licensed under this act may only prescribe and administer immunizations recommended for healthy individuals age seven (7) and older in a private space utilized for counseling and administering immunizations to ensure patient safety and confidentiality as authorized by the board. Parental consent shall be required for prescriptions for immunizations and for administration of immunizations pursuant to this section for any minor child. A pharmacist administering vaccinations pursuant to this section shall enter a record of the immunization in the Wyoming immunization registry operated by the department of health. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to require any pharmacist to administer immunizations to individuals who are less than thirteen (13) years of age. No employer shall discriminate against a pharmacist on the basis that the pharmacist determines not to administer immunizations to individuals who are less than thirteen (13) years of age.

A pharmacist licensed under this act may administer immunizations to adults who are considered high risk only by prescription from a licensed physician.

The board, in cooperation with the Wyoming state board of medicine, shall adopt rules specifying immunizations allowed under this act and the requirements a pharmacist shall meet in order to prescribe and administer immunizations, including requirements for spaces in which immunizations shall be administered by a pharmacist.

A pharmacy technician or pharmacy intern licensed under this act shall only administer immunizations under the supervision of a pharmacist licensed under this act. A pharmacy technician or pharmacy intern who intends to administer immunizations shall register with the board, but nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to require any pharmacy technician to administer immunizations to individuals who are less than thirteen (13) years of age. No employer shall discriminate against a pharmacy technician on the basis that the pharmacy technician determines not to administer immunizations to individuals who are less than thirteen (13) years of age.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 121, § 1; 2013 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2022 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a); and added “, including requirements for spaces in which immunizations shall be administered by a pharmacist” following “immunizations” in (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 121, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 33-24-158.
Prescription of epinephrine auto-injector or opiate antagonist by pharmacist.

A pharmacist licensed under this act may prescribe an opiate antagonist in accordance with the Emergency Administration of Medical Treatment Act.

The board, in cooperation with the Wyoming state board of medicine, shall adopt rules specifying the requirements a pharmacist shall meet in order to prescribe an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist.

History.

2017 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “Emergency Administration of Medical Treatment Act” for “Emergency Administration of Opiate Antagonist Act” in (a); and added “epinephrine auto-injector or an” in (b).

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.